dev/verbs/VERBS-scraps.lexc
LEXICON V-IV-DIR-IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;


LEXICON V-TV-DIR-AR 

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;

LEXICON V-TV-T-AR 

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;


LEXICON V-IV-DIR-AR 

%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Verbs
et:e%{t%} V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "make"
git:gi%{t%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go"
oyna:oyna V-TV-T-AR ; ! "play"
aç:aç V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "open"
don:don V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "freeze"
eş:eş V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "scratch"
eş:eş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "scratch"
kap:kap V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "snatch, seize, grab"
yak:yak V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fire"
yan:yan V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "burn, be on fire"
bur:bur V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
der:der V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
dür:dür V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
ger:ger V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
kal:kal V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "stay"
kur:kur V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
sal:sal V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
sil:sil V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
sol:sol V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
yar:yar V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
yat:yat V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "lie up"
yol:yol V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
yıl:yıl V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
çel:çel V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
adaklan:adaklan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
akçıllan:akçıllan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
antlaş:antlaş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
arlan:arlan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
avun:avun V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aytış:aytış V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
ağalan:ağalan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
ağırşaklan:ağırşaklan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dehşetlen:dehşetlen V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
depreş:depreş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
değerlen:değerlen V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dilen:dilen V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
diret:diret V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
duygulan:duygulan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dırlaş:dırlaş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
efkarlan:efkarlan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
esaslan:esaslan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
evinlen:evinlen V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
eşin:eşin V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
gayretlen:gayretlen V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
genleş:genleş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
gezin:gezin V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
homurdan:homurdan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
keşfet:keşfet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "discover"
kesiş:kesiş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "intersect"
kır:kır V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "break"
kırp:kırp V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "trim"
kıy:kıy V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "chop up"
kız:kız V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be angry"
kokuş:kokuş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "putrefy"
kon:kon V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "perch"
kop:kop V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "shear off"
koş:koş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "run"
koy:koy V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "put"
küfret:küfret V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "revile"
kus:kus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "vomit"
küs:küs V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "become stunted"
kuşkulan:kuşkulan V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "suspect"
lağvet:lağvet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "proscribe"
manevra% yap:manevra% yap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "manoeuver"
menet:menet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "preclude"
meylet:meylet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be inclined"
neşelen:neşelen V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "rejoice"
nükset:nükset V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "recur"
ölç:ölç V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "measure"
oluş:oluş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "come into existence"
on:on V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be happy"
ört:ört V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "cover"
öt:öt V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "warble"
öv:öv V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "praise"
oy% ver:oy% ver V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "vote"
pasta% yap:pasta% yap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "make a cake"
piş:piş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "cook"
pus:pus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "shrink"
reddet:reddet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "refuse"
saç:saç V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "scatter"
san:san V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "suppose"
sap:sap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "deviate"
sar:sar V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "cover"
şaş:şaş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "amaze"
sataş:sataş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "tease"
sav:sav V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "ward off"
seç:seç V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "choose"
sek:sek V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "rebound"
serp:serp V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "sprinkle"
seyret:seyre%{t%} V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "watch"
şiddetlen:şiddetlen V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "become stronger"
sığ:sığ V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fit into"
sik:sik V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fuck"
sil:sil V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "erase, delete"
silkin:silkin V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "shake oneself"
sin:sin V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "permeate"
sın:sın V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "feel frightened"
şiş:şiş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "swell"
sız:sız V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "leak"
sok:sok V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "thrust"
sol:sol V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fade"
sön:sön V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be deflated"
sor:sor V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "ask"
sözleş:sözleş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "promise each other"
şükret:şükret V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "render thanks"
sun:sun V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "compere"
sus:sus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "to be quiet"
süz:süz V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "filter"
tanış:tanış V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "meet"
tap:tap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "worship"
tart:tart V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "weigh"
taş:taş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "pour out"
temsil% et:temsil% e%{t%} V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "symbolise"
terket:terket V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "leave"
tık:tık V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "cram into"
tiksin:tiksin V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be disgusted"
tüken:tüken V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be exhausted"
tüt:tüt V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fumatory"
uç:uç V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fly"
uğraş:uğraş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "strive"
um:um V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "expect"
ürk:ürk V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "scare"
üş:üş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "concentrate at somewhere"
usan:usan V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be collected"
ut:ut V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "to win in gamble"
uzlaş:uzlaş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "make a deal"
vazgeç:vazgeç V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "give up"
yağ:yağ V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "rain down on"
yakış:yakış V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "become, befit"
yan:yan V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "burn, take fire"
yar:yar V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "split"
yararlan:yararlan V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "benefit from"
yatış:yatış V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "quiet down"
yer:yer ver V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "give place to"
yet:yet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "suffice"
yığ:yığ V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "accumulate"
yıl:yıl V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "give up"
yit:yit V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be lost"
yoğrul:yoğrul V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be kneaded"
yor:yor V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "ascribe"
yüksel:yüksel V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "rise"
yun:yun V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "bathe"
zannet:zannet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "suppose"
zulmet:zulmet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "oppress"
ağın:ağın V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "roll on the ground"
ak:ak V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "flow, leak"
alıkonul:alıkonul V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be derailed"
arızalan:arızalan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "break down, go out of order"
art:art V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "increase"
as:as V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "hang, suspend"
ay:ay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "awake?"
aydınlan:aydınlan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "light up"
az:az V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "become depraved"
azmet:azmet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "determine"
ban:ban V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "dip into"
barın:barın V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "shelter"
bay:bay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "turn somebody off"
benzeş:benzeş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be in acord with"
bez:bez V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fed up"
bin:bin V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "mount, ride"
birik:birik V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "consist"
bit:bi%{t%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "finish"
bük:bük V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "bend"
bunal:bunal V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "get bored"
çalış:çalış V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "study, work"
çap:çap V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "rush"
cay:cay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "retract"
çek:çek V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "pull"
çekiş:çekiş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "debate"
çırp:çırp V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "whisk"
çoğal:çoğal V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "increase, propagate"
coş:coş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "emotionalise"
dal:dal V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "dive"
de:de V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
der:der V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "collect"
dil:dil V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "slice"
diril:diril V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "revive"
doğ:doğ V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "born"
don:don V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "freeze"
dönüş:dönüş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "return to"
doy:doy V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "be full up"
düş:düş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fall"
duy:duy V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "hear"
eğ:eğ V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "bend"
eğil:eğil V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "incline"
emret:emret V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "command"
eriş:eriş V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "reach"
farket:farket V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "realize, notice"
gel:gel V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "come to a stop"
ger:ger V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "stretch"
gez:gez V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go around"
gezin:gezin V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "hang around"
git:gi%{t%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go"
gözük:gözük V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "to be seem"
hafifle:hafifle V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "get lighter"
hallet:hallet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "solve"
hamlet:hamlet V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "attribute"
hisset:hisset V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "feel"
hoşlan:hoşlan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "like"
in:in V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "go down"
kaç:kaç V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "escape"
kaçın:kaçın V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "avoid"
kak:kak V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "push"
kan:kan V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "be cheated"
kastet:kastet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "aim at"
katıl:katıl V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "join in"
kaybet:kaybet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "lose"
